North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 8. Dissolution.

§ 59-801.
Nonjudicial dissolution.

A limited partnership is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up upon the happening of the first to occur of the following:

At the time specified in the certificate of limited partnership or upon the happening of events specified in writing in the partnership agreement;

Written consent of all partners;

An event of withdrawal of a general partner unless:

At the time there is at least one other general partner, in which case, unless otherwise provided in a written partnership agreement or agreed upon by all remaining partners, (i) the limited partnership is not dissolved, (ii) the limited partnership shall not be wound up, and (iii) the business of the limited partnership shall be continued by the remaining general partners; or

Within 90 days after the withdrawal, all remaining partners, or a lesser number or portion of the partners provided in the partnership agreement, agree in writing to continue the business of the limited partnership and to the appointment of one or more additional general partners if necessary or desired, in which case the limited partnership is not dissolved and is not required to be wound up by reason of the event of withdrawal;

(3a)

Ninety days after the withdrawal of the limited partnership’s last limited partner, unless the limited partnership admits at least one limited partner before the end of the 90 days; or

Entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under

G.S. 59-802

.

The causes of dissolution of a limited partnership shall be governed solely by this Article. Article 2 of this Chapter, which governs the causes of dissolution of a partnership without limited partners, does not apply and shall not govern the causes of dissolution of a limited partnership.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 33.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Creation of North Carolina’s Limited Liability Corporation Act,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 179 (1997).

§ 59-802.
Judicial dissolution.

On application by or for a partner the court may decree dissolution of a limited partnership whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the partnership agreement. The limited partnership’s name becomes available for use by another entity as provided in

G.S. 55D-21

.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 2001-358, s. 36; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 59-803.
Winding up.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, the general partners who have not wrongfully dissolved a limited partnership or, if none, the limited partners, may wind up the limited partnership’s affairs; but the court may wind up the limited partnership’s affairs upon application of any partner, his legal representative, or assignee.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-804.
Distribution of assets.

Upon the winding up of a limited partnership, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

To creditors, including limited partners who are creditors, to the extent otherwise permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited partnership other than liabilities for distributions to partners under

G.S. 59-601

or

G.S. 59-604

;

To general partners who are creditors to the extent otherwise permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited partnership other than liabilities for distributions to partners under

G.S. 59-601

or

G.S. 59-604

;

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners and former partners in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under

G.S. 59-601

or

G.S. 59-604

; and

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners first for the return of their contributions and secondly respecting their partnership interests, in the proportions in which the partners share in distributions.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§§ 59-805 through 59-900.

Reserved for future codification purposes.